src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PRONPer+NA+Excl_Class=PRONPer+NA+Excl_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+PRONPer+NA+Excl: EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONPer+NA+Incl                                            !
!         Prefixes                                                             !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONPer+NA+Incl_Prefix
@P.Prefix.NONE@ PRONPer+NA+Incl_PrefixBoundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONPer+NA+Incl                                            !
!         Morpheme boundary between prefix and stem                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONPer+NA+Incl_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< PronounStems ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONPer+NA+Incl                                            !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONPer+NA+Incl_Stems
gegiinawind PRONPer+NA+Incl_Class=PRONPer+NA+Incl_Boundary ;
giinawind PRONPer+NA+Incl_Class=PRONPer+NA+Incl_Boundary ;
giinetawind PRONPer+NA+Incl_Class=PRONPer+NA+Incl_Boundary ;
giinitamawind PRONPer+NA+Incl_Class=PRONPer+NA+Incl_Boundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONPer+NA+Incl, Class: PRONPer+NA+Incl                    !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONPer+NA+Incl_Class=PRONPer+NA+Incl_Boundary
0:%>%> PRONPer+NA+Incl_Class=PRONPer+NA+Incl_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONPer+NA+Incl, Class: PRONPer+NA+Incl                    !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONPer+NA+Incl_Class=PRONPer+NA+Incl_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ PRONPer+NA+Incl_Class=PRONPer+NA+Incl_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONPer+NA+Incl, Class: PRONPer+NA+Incl                    !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONPer+NA+Incl_Class=PRONPer+NA+Incl_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ PRONPer+NA+Incl_Class=PRONPer+NA+Incl_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONPer+NA+Incl, Class: PRONPer+NA+Incl, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONPer+NA+Incl_Class=PRONPer+NA+Incl_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+PRONPer+NA+Incl: EncliticRoot ;
